test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-putma54_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `putma: # Verb (54) `'/(eng) to touch /(fin) koskettaa' - partial paradigm
     putma+V+Inf/mA: putma
     putma+V+Inf: puttuq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putu
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: putut
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: putus
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: putumiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pututiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: putusõq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: putu
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: putuda
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pututat
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pututas
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pututamiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pututatiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pututasõq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: putuda

     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puttõ
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puttõt
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puttõ
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puttõmiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puttõtiq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puttõq
     putma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: putu
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: putudi
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pututit
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pututi
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pututimiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pututitiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: putudiq
     putma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: putuda

     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: putva
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: putva
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: putvat
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: putvahe
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: putvaq
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: putvidõ
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: putvit
     putma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: putvihe
                    
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pututav
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pututava
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: pututavat
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pututavahe
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pututavaq
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: pututavidõ
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: pututavit
     putma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: pututavihe

     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: putnuq
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: putnu
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: putnut
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: putnuhe
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: putnuq
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: putnuidõ
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: putnuid
     putma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: putnuihe

     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: putut
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: putudu
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: pututut
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pututuhe
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: putuduq
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: pututuidõ
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: pututuid
     putma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: pututuihe

     putma+V+Act+Jus: putkuq
